Ohio, session 136, HB410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5162.09 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5162.09. No medicaid funds shall be paid to an entit y 6
that is prohibited from receiving federal funds under section 7
71113 of Pub. Law No. 119-21. 8